Vermont, session 2025-2026, S250.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 7624a is added to read:
§ 7624a. ADMINISTRATION OF INVOLUNTARY MEDICATION
EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES
(a) In emergency circumstances where an application for involuntary
medication has been filed pursuant to section 7624 of this chapter, but an order
has not yet been issued, a patient’s treating physician may authorize the
administration of involuntary psychiatric medication when the following
conditions are met:
VT LEG #385854 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.250
2026 Page 2 of 6
(1) the patient’s treating physician has informed the patient of the
following:
(A) the name and dosage of the proposed medication;
(B) the reason for ordering the proposed medication;
(C) the expected benefits of the proposed medication;
(D) the potential risks and side effects of the proposed medication;
(E) the right to refuse the proposed medication; and
(F) the status of the application for involuntary medication pursuant
to section 7624 of this title;
(2) the patient either orally refuses the proposed medication, cannot
communicate refusal, or otherwise indicates refusal of the proposed medication
after a reasonable attempt to obtain voluntary acceptance of the proposed
medication: and
(3) the medical director of the hospital unit or secure residential
recovery facility where the patient is committed and the medical director of the
Department have jointly determined that:
(A) less intrusive alternatives to the proposed medication have been
considered, documented in the patient’s medical record, and found unlikely to
meet the needs of the patient; and
(B) the proposed medication is necessary and the least restrictive
intervention reasonably required to address the emergency circumstance.
VT LEG #385854 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.250
2026 Page 3 of 6
(b)(1) Authority to administer the medication under this section shall expire
when the emergency circumstance ceases to exist or after 72 hours, whichever
is first occurring.
(2)(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection (b), if the
emergency circumstance persists or the emergency circumstance has abated
because of the effect of the medication and the treating physician is of the
opinion that the medication is necessary to keep the emergency in abeyance
beyond 72 hours, then within that 72 hours, the hospital or secure residential
recovery facility where the patient is committed shall file a written request to
the court where the patient’s application for involuntary medication is pending
for an emergency hearing within five business days. The filing shall contain a
joint certification from the medical director of the hospital unit or secure
residential recovery facility where the patient is committed and the medical
director of the Department that continued medication is necessary to prevent an
emergency circumstance or to keep the emergency circumstance in abeyance.
Upon receipt of the emergency filing, the court shall review the patient’s
underlying application for involuntary medication in accordance with sections
7624 and 7625 of this chapter.
(B) If a complete court filing is not made within 72 hours, then the
medication shall be discontinued until the filing can be made, except in cases
where life threatening consequences could result from an abrupt medication
VT LEG #385854 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.250
2026 Page 4 of 6
discontinuation. Under these circumstances, the patient shall be taken safely
off the medication according to standards of medical practice with
corresponding clinical documentation.
(3) In no case shall a patient receive emergency medication under this
section for a period exceeding 10 days without an order from the court where
the patient’s application for involuntary medication is pending.
(c) Within 12 hours after administering medication pursuant to this section,
the treating physician shall document the basis for the emergency
circumstance, less intrusive alternatives considered, the type and dosage of the
medication administered, information provided to the patient prior to and at the
time of administration, the nature of the patient’s refusal or inability to refuse
the medication, and the clinical rationale for administration of the medication.
(d) As soon as practicable after the administration of medication pursuant
to this section, the hospital or secure residential recovery facility where the
patient is committed shall notify the patient’s attorney and, if applicable, the
agent designated in the patients’ advance directive regarding the decision to
initiate or continue involuntary medication.
(e) Each designated hospital and secure residential recovery facility shall
adopt written procedures regarding staff training, documentation, and
compliance with the administration of involuntary medication in emergency
circumstances pursuant to this section.
VT LEG #385854 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.250
2026 Page 5 of 6
(f) A health care professional who prescribes, dispenses, or administers
medication pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability, unless
the health care professional’s actions with regard to prescribing, dispensing, or
administering the medication constituted recklessness, gross negligence, or
intentional misconduct. The immunity granted in this subsection shall apply to
the hospital or secure residential recovery facility where the patient is receiving
treatment. The administration of medication pursuant to this section shall not
constitute a violation of the patient’s rights under 18 V.S.A. chapter 42,
subchapter 1.
(g) The Commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement the provisions in this section.
(h) As used in this section, “emergency circumstance” means that:
(1) the patient is actively engaging in conduct, or has the present ability
and manifested intent to engage in immediate conduct, that poses a risk of
serious bodily harm to the patient or to others, but not necessarily that the harm
has taken place or become unavoidable prior to administration of the
medication;
(2) the patient’s medical condition is likely to deteriorate in a manner
that would cause irreparable harm while awaiting the outcome on the
application for involuntary medication filed in accordance with section 7624 of
this chapter;
VT LEG #385854 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.250
2026 Page 6 of 6
(3) immediate administration of the medication is necessary to preserve
life, lessen immediate suffering, or prevent serious bodily harm to the patient
or others; and
(4) the medical director of the hospital unit and secure residential
recovery facility where the patient is committed and the medical director of the
Department have jointly determined that it is impracticable to wait for a
hearing pursuant section 7624 of this chapter before administering the
medication.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385854 v.1